Utah statutes.
78B-15-502.   Order for testing.

(1)  Upon the motion of any party to the action, except as otherwise provided in this part and Part 6, Adjudication of Parentage, the tribunal shall order the child and other designated individuals to submit to genetic testing if the request for testing is supported by the sworn statement of a party to the proceeding:

(a)  alleging paternity and stating facts establishing a reasonable probability of the requisite sexual contact between the individuals; or

(b)  denying paternity and stating facts establishing a possibility that sexual contact between the individuals, if any, did not result in the conception of the child.

(2)  If a request for genetic testing of a child is made before birth, the tribunal may not order in-utero testing.

(3)  If two or more men are subject to an order for genetic testing, the testing may be ordered concurrently or sequentially.

